Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [121A.217] MENTAL HEALTH CARE SERVICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Mental health services for students. new text end new text begin The commissioner of education must select a mental health care provider to provide mental health services to students through telehealth. The mental health care provider must work with schools across the state to provide services to students and their families, subject to parental consent where required by applicable law. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Mental health care provider. new text end new text begin (a) By January 1, 2027, the commissioner must select a mental health care provider. new text end new text begin (b) The mental health care provider selected by the commissioner must provide all telehealth services using clinicians licensed in Minnesota. The mental health care provider must provide services through telehealth and maintain appointment availability within one week from referral to the first session with a licensed clinician. The mental health care provider must demonstrate a track record of billing insurance for services, including private insurance and Minnesota medical assistance plans. The mental health care provider must demonstrate capacity to serve students statewide across rural, suburban, and urban areas. new text end new text begin (c) For purposes of this section, "telehealth" has the meaning given in section 62A.673. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin The mental health care provider selected by the commissioner must meet annual progress reporting requirements. By July 1 of each year, the mental health care provider must report to the commissioner, in the form and manner determined by the commissioner, on metrics including number of students with access to mental health care, rates of engagement with students, clinical outcomes, and overall cost effectiveness. Data must be disaggregated and reported by district. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Mental health services. new text end new text begin For a grant to a mental health care provider to provide mental health services to students through telehealth under Minnesota Statutes, section 121A.217: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 9,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end